Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202671-1924
Children's Residential Facilities and Placing Licensure Act; act, how cited.

Sections 71-1924 to 71-1951 shall be known and may be cited as the Children's Residential Facilities and Placing Licensure Act.

Laws 2013, LB265, § 1;

Laws 2019, LB460, § 4;

Laws 2025, LB217, § 4.